waterfox/browser/locales/lt/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lt.aff
SET UTF-8

TRY iastnokreuldvėmgpjšbyžūczfčhąįųęwxq

REP 29
REP ą a         # vowels
REP a ą
REP ę e
REP e ę
REP ė e
REP e ė
REP į i
REP i į
REP į y
REP y į
REP y i
REP i y
REP ų u
REP u ų
REP ų ū
REP ū ų
REP ū u
REP u ū
REP o uo        # diphtongs and other compounds
REP e ie
REP e ia
REP ia e
REP ė ie
REP š s         # consonants
REP š ž
REP k g
REP g k
REP z s
REP s z

MAP 4
MAP aą          # related chars; TODO: add nearby mistype relations
MAP eęė
MAP iįy
MAP uūų

PFX N Y 2
PFX N 0       ne              .
PFX N 0       nebe            .

PFX S Y 6
PFX S 0       ne              .
PFX S 0       nebe            .
PFX S 0       nesi            .
PFX S 0       nebesi          .
PFX S 0       besi            .
PFX S 0       tebesi          .

PFX X Y 3
PFX X 0       be              .
PFX X 0       te              .
PFX X 0       tebe            .

PFX a Y 4
PFX a 0       api             [pb]
PFX a 0       ap              [^pb]
PFX a 0       neapi           [pb]
PFX a 0       neap            [^pb]

PFX b Y 4
PFX b 0       ati             [dt]
PFX b 0       at              [^dt]
PFX b 0       neati           [dt]
PFX b 0       neat            [^dt]

PFX c Y 2
PFX c 0       į               .
PFX c 0       neį             .

PFX d Y 2
PFX d 0       iš              .
PFX d 0       neiš            .

PFX e Y 2
PFX e 0       nu              .
PFX e 0       nenu            .

PFX f Y 2
PFX f 0       pa              .
PFX f 0       nepa            .

PFX g Y 2
PFX g 0       par             .
PFX g 0       nepar           .

PFX h Y 2
PFX h 0       per             .
PFX h 0       neper           .

PFX i Y 2
PFX i 0       pra             .
PFX i 0       nepra           .

PFX j Y 2
PFX j 0       pri             .
PFX j 0       nepri           .

PFX k Y 2
PFX k 0       su              .
PFX k 0       nesu            .

PFX l Y 2
PFX l 0       už              .
PFX l 0       neuž            .

PFX m Y 2
PFX m 0       apsi            .
PFX m 0       neapsi          .

PFX n Y 2
PFX n 0       atsi            .
PFX n 0       neatsi          .

PFX o Y 2
PFX o 0       įsi             .
PFX o 0       neįsi           .

PFX p Y 2
PFX p 0       išsi            .
PFX p 0       neišsi          .

PFX q Y 2
PFX q 0       nusi            .
PFX q 0       nenusi          .

PFX r Y 2
PFX r 0       pasi            .
PFX r 0       nepasi          .

PFX s Y 2
PFX s 0       parsi           .
PFX s 0       neparsi         .

PFX t Y 2
PFX t 0       persi           .
PFX t 0       nepersi         .

PFX u Y 2
PFX u 0       prasi           .
PFX u 0       neprasi         .

PFX v Y 2
PFX v 0       prisi           .
PFX v 0       neprisi         .

PFX w Y 2
PFX w 0       susi            .
PFX w 0       nesusi          .

PFX x Y 2
PFX x 0       užsi            .
PFX x 0       neužsi          .

SFX B Y 148
SFX B as      o               as
SFX B s       m               as
SFX B as      ą               as
SFX B as      u               as
SFX B s       me              as
SFX B as      i               [^i]as
SFX B as      ų               as
SFX B as      iems            [^i]as
SFX B as      iem             [^i]as
SFX B as      us              as
SFX B s       is              as
SFX B as      uose            as
SFX B s       0               as
SFX B as      os              as
SFX B s       i               as
SFX B as      oje             as
SFX B as      oj              as
SFX B as      oms             as
SFX B as      om              as
SFX B as      omis            as
SFX B as      ose             as
SFX B as      0               [^d][^č]ias
SFX B čias    ti              čias
SFX B as      ems             [^d][^č]ias
SFX B as      em              [^d][^č]ias
SFX B čias    tiems           čias
SFX B čias    tiem            čias
SFX B s       o               [^djt]is
SFX B s       am              [^djt]is
SFX B is      į               is
SFX B s       u               [^djt]is
SFX B s       ame             [^djt]is
SFX B s       0               is
SFX B is      žio             dis
SFX B is      žiam            dis
SFX B is      žiu             dis
SFX B is      žiame           dis
SFX B is      o               jis
SFX B is      am              jis
SFX B is      u               jis
SFX B is      ame             jis
SFX B tis     čio             tis
SFX B tis     čiam            tis
SFX B tis     čiu             tis
SFX B tis     čiame           tis
SFX B s       ai              [^djt]is
SFX B s       ų               [^djt]is
SFX B s       us              [^djt]is
SFX B s       ais             [^djt]is
SFX B s       uose            [^djt]is
SFX B is      žiai            dis
SFX B is      žių             dis
SFX B is      žius            dis
SFX B is      žiais           dis
SFX B is      žiuose          dis
SFX B is      ai              jis
SFX B is      ų               jis
SFX B is      us              jis
SFX B is      ais             jis
SFX B is      uose            jis
SFX B tis     čiai            tis
SFX B tis     čių             tis
SFX B tis     čius            tis
SFX B tis     čiais           tis
SFX B tis     čiuose          tis
SFX B is      ė               is
SFX B is      ės              is
SFX B is      ei              is
SFX B is      ę               is
SFX B is      e               is
SFX B is      ėje             is
SFX B is      ėj              is
SFX B is      ėms             is
SFX B is      es              is
SFX B is      ėmis            is
SFX B is      ėse             is
SFX B us      aus             us
SFX B us      iam             [^djt]us
SFX B us      žiam            dus
SFX B us      am              jus
SFX B tus     čiam            tus
SFX B us      ų               us
SFX B us      iu              [^djt]us
SFX B us      žiu             dus
SFX B s       0               jus
SFX B tus     čiu             tus
SFX B us      iame            [^djt]us
SFX B us      žiame           dus
SFX B us      ame             jus
SFX B tus     čiame           tus
SFX B us      ūs              us
SFX B us      ių              [^djt]us
SFX B us      žių             dus
SFX B tus     čių             tus
SFX B us      iems            us
SFX B us      iem             us
SFX B us      ius             [^djt]us
SFX B us      žius            dus
SFX B tus     čius            tus
SFX B us      iais            [^djt]us
SFX B us      žiais           dus
SFX B us      ais             jus
SFX B tus     čiais           tus
SFX B us      iuose           [^dtj]us
SFX B us      žiuose          dus
SFX B s       ose             jus
SFX B tus     čiuose          tus
SFX B us      i               us
SFX B us      ios             [^djt]us
SFX B us      iai             [^djt]us
SFX B us      ią              [^djt]us
SFX B us      ia              [^djt]us
SFX B us      ioje            [^djt]us
SFX B us      ioj             [^djt]us
SFX B us      žios            dus
SFX B us      žiai            dus
SFX B us      žią             dus
SFX B us      žia             dus
SFX B us      žioje           dus
SFX B us      žioj            dus
SFX B us      os              jus
SFX B us      ai              jus
SFX B us      ą               jus
SFX B us      a               jus
SFX B us      oje             jus
SFX B us      oj              jus
SFX B tus     čios            tus
SFX B tus     čiai            tus
SFX B tus     čią             tus
SFX B tus     čia             tus
SFX B tus     čioje           tus
SFX B tus     čioj            tus
SFX B us      ioms            [^djt]us
SFX B us      ias             [^djt]us
SFX B us      iomis           [^djt]us
SFX B us      iose            [^djt]us
SFX B us      žioms           dus
SFX B us      žias            dus
SFX B us      žiomis          dus
SFX B us      žiose           dus
SFX B us      oms             jus
SFX B us      as              jus
SFX B us      omis            jus
SFX B us      ose             jus
SFX B tus     čioms           tus
SFX B tus     čias            tus
SFX B tus     čiomis          tus
SFX B tus     čiose           tus
